Washington statutes.
RCW 40.06.050

Center to publish list of publications and other descriptive matter.

The center shall publish and distribute regularly a list of available state publications, and may publish and distribute such other descriptive matter as will facilitate the distribution of and access to state publications.

[ 2006 c 199 s 7; 1963 c 233 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 199: See note following RCW 27.04.045.